Hawaii, session 2026, SB3241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that continuous education in fire risk mitigation and fire safety can produce safer and more resilient condominium communities, resulting in a reduction of fire incidents, lower insurance costs, and greater public confidence in multi-unit residential buildings. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish: (1)  A fire risk management and safety documentation pilot program; and (2)  A fire risk management and safety documentation working group to oversee the fire risk management and safety documentation pilot program and to evaluate its results. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the department of law enforcement for administrative purposes only a two-year fire risk management and safety documentation pilot program. (b) The purpose of the fire risk management and safety documentation pilot program shall be to promote proactive fire risk management practices among condominium associations and owners, county and state fire prevention agencies, and condominium management and insurance industry stakeholders.  The fire risk management and safety documentation pilot program shall: (1)  Encourage insurers in the State to factor fire safety mitigation practices into rate setting; (2)  Collaborate with the state fire marshal and Honolulu fire department to: (A)  Offer fire safety workshops for property managers and condominium association owners and boards; (B)  Develop and distribute educational materials for condominium residents and property managers; and (C)  Furnish standardized reporting forms to document and confirm inspection results and fire safety compliance; (3)  Document fire safety activities, inspections, and systems, including the installation, maintenance, and repair of fire safety equipment; (4)  Collaborate with property management companies to: (A)  Implement and promote fire safety procedures; (B)  Maintain records of fire safety activities, inspections, maintenance, and incident reports; (C)  Submit documentation of fire risk mitigation and fire safety compliance to insurers in the State for risk assessment and premium rate setting; (D)  Analyze and use post-incident reviews to enhance fire safety policies, procedures, and training; and (E)  Develop a fire safety certification program which shall attest to the fire safety mitigation and inspection activities of participating condominium associations. SECTION 3. (a)  There is established a fire risk management and safety documentation working group to oversee the fire risk management and safety documentation pilot program. (b) The fire risk management and safety documentation working group shall comprise the following members: (1)  One member each from of the senate and house of representatives standing committees whose purviews include consumer protection, to be appointed respectively by the president and speaker of the house of representatives; (2)  The fire chief of the Honolulu fire department or the department's designee; (3)  Three members representing three condominium association boards, respectively; and (4)  Two members representing two property management companies; (5)  Two members representing two Hawaii-domiciled insurers that provide property insurance in the State; and (6)  The insurance commissioner or their designee who shall be a non-voting member. (c)  The fire risk management and safety documentation working group shall: (1)  Select a representative sample of not less than ten but not more than fifteen condominium associations in a county with a population of five hundred thousand or more to participate in the pilot program; provided that the condominium association board of each participating condominium community shall submit to the working group annually: (A)  Reports detailing fire safety inspection results, resident education activities, fire incident summaries, and corrective actions and future improvements; and (B)  Documentation that the participating condominium association received a satisfactory fire safety rating using the modified building fire and life safety evaluation from the Honolulu fire department or a qualified third-party assessor that is valid for one year; (2)  Collect data on fire incidents, costs, and insurance responses; (3)  Establish a secure online data-sharing portal for: (A)  Condominium association boards to provide a summary of fire safety procedures provided to insures for integration into risk models; and (B)  Insurers to share claims trends and insights with the working group and participating condominium associations; (4)  Collaborate with insurers to: (A)  Determine which fire risk mitigation strategies and fire safety documents influence risk-based pricing; and (B)  Reduce premiums or lower premiums or reduce and lower premiums for condominiums that have implemented fire risk mitigation strategies and fire safety procedures; and (5)  Adjust program requirements based on fire safety outcomes, insurance claims and responses, and feedback from participating condominium associations. (d) The members of the working group shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (e) No member of the working group shall be subject to chapter 84, Hawaii Revised Statutes, solely because of the member's participation in the working group. (f) The department of law enforcement shall provide administrative assistance to the working group. (g)  The fire risk management and safety documentation working group shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027.  The report shall detail: (1)  The outcomes of the fire risk management and safety documentation pilot program with respect to fire safety and the type of documentation that would support risk-based pricing by insurers; (2)  The level of county or state fire inspections that should be integrated into county and state fire prevention efforts; and (3)  The types of grants and incentives that should be integrated into county and state fire prevention efforts and proactive fire safety improvements. (h) The fire risk management and safety documentation working group shall cease to exist on June 30, 2028. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the activities of the working group established pursuant to this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________